Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.550

Public health services improvement plan—Contents.

The public health services improvement plan developed under *RCW 43.70.520 shall include:

(1) Minimum standards for state and local public health assessment, performance measurement, policy development, and assurance regarding social development to reduce at-risk behaviors and risk and protective factors. The department in the development of data collection and reporting requirements for the superintendent of public instruction, schools, and school districts shall consult with the joint select committee on education restructuring and local school districts.

(2)(a) Measurable risk factors that are empirically linked to violent criminal acts by juveniles, teen substance abuse, teen pregnancy and male parentage, teen suicide attempts, dropping out of school, child abuse or neglect, and domestic violence; and

(b) An evaluation of other factors to determine whether they are empirically related risk factors, such as: Out-of-home placements, poverty, single-parent households, inadequate nutrition, hunger, unemployment, lack of job skills, gang affiliation, lack of recreational or cultural opportunities, school absenteeism, court-ordered parenting plans, physical, emotional, or behavioral problems requiring special needs assistance in K-12 schools, learning disabilities, and any other possible factors.

(3) Data collection and analysis standards on at-risk behaviors and risk and protective factors for use by the local public health departments and the **state council and the local community networks to ensure consistent and interchangeable data.

(4) Recommendations regarding any state or federal statutory barriers affecting data collection or reporting.

The department shall provide an annual report to the Washington state institute for public policy on the implementation of this section.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 203.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 43.70.520 was repealed by 2019 c 14 s 3.

**(2) RCW 70.170.030, which created the health care access and cost control council, was repealed by 1995 c 269 s 2204.

Finding—Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Contingent expiration date—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.